fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-pahkêkin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - pahkêkinw - ok : # -m inanimate noun, leather, rawhide AEW NI3
     pahkêkin+N+I+Sg: pahkêkin
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nipahkêkin
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kipahkêkin
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: nipahkêkinonân
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg: kipahkêkinonaw
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kipahkêkinowâw
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: opahkêkin
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg: opahkêkinowâw
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: opahkêkinoyiw

     pahkêkin+N+I+Pl: pahkêkinwa
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nipahkêkinwa
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kipahkêkinwa
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nipahkêkinonâna
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl: kipahkêkinonawa
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kipahkêkinowâwa
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: opahkêkinwa
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl: opahkêkinowâwa
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: opahkêkinoyiwa

     pahkêkin+N+I+Loc: pahkêkinohk
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: nipahkêkinohk
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc: kipahkêkinohk
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc: nipahkêkinonâhk
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px21Pl+Loc: kipahkêkinonâhk
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc: kipahkêkinowâhk
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc: opahkêkinohk
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc: opahkêkinowâhk
     pahkêkin+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: opahkêkinoyihk

     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg:          [pahkêkinos,         pahkêkinosis]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nipahkêkinos,       nipahkêkinosis]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kipahkêkinos,       kipahkêkinosis]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nipahkêkinosinân,   nipahkêkinosisinân]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kipahkêkinosinaw,   kipahkêkinosisinaw]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kipahkêkinosiwâw,   kipahkêkinosisiwâw]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg:    [opahkêkinos,        opahkêkinosis]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg:    [opahkêkinosiwâw,    opahkêkinosisiwâw]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [opahkêkinosiyiw,    opahkêkinosisiyiw]

     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl:          [pahkêkinosa,       pahkêkinosisa]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nipahkêkinosa,     nipahkêkinosisa]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kipahkêkinosa,     kipahkêkinosisa]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nipahkêkinosinâna, nipahkêkinosisinâna]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kipahkêkinosinawa, kipahkêkinosisinawa]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kipahkêkinosiwâwa, kipahkêkinosisiwâwa]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl:    [opahkêkinosa,      opahkêkinosisa]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl:    [opahkêkinosiwâwa,  opahkêkinosisiwâwa]
     pahkêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: [opahkêkinosiyiwa,  opahkêkinosisiyiwa]
